California, session 20252026, SB407.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15372 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15372. (a) The elections official shall prepare a certified statement of the results of the election and submit it to the governing body within 30 10 days of the election or, in the case of school district, community college district, county board of education, or special district elections conducted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years, no later than the last Monday before the last Friday of that month. election.(b) The elections official shall post the certified statement of the results of the election on his or her Internet Web site internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software application that is widely used at the time of the posting. The certified statement of the election results shall be posted and maintained on the elections official’s Internet Web site internet website for a period of at least 10 years following the election. This subdivision shall apply applies only to an elections official who uses a computer system that has the capability of producing the election results in a downloadable spreadsheet format without requiring modification of the computer system.SEC. 2. Section 15375 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15375. The elections official shall send to the Secretary of State within 31 11 days of the election in an electronic format in the manner requested one complete copy of all results as to all of the following:(a) All candidates voted for statewide office.(b) All candidates voted for the following offices:(1) Member of the Assembly.(2) Member of the Senate.(3) Member of the United States House of Representatives.(4) Member of the State Board of Equalization.(5) Justice of the Court of Appeal.(6) Judge of the superior court.(c) All persons voted for at the presidential primary. The results for all persons voted for at the presidential primary for delegates to national conventions shall be canvassed and shall be sent within 28 days after the election.(d) The vote given for persons for electors of President and Vice President of the United States. The results for presidential electors shall be endorsed “Presidential Election Returns” and shall be canvassed and sent within 28 days after the election. Returns.”(e) All statewide measures.(f) The total number of ballots cast.SEC. 3. Section 15501 of the Elections Code is amended to read:15501. (a) Except as to presidential electors, the Secretary of State shall compile the results for all of the following:(1) All candidates for statewide office.(2) All candidates for Assembly, State Senate, Congress, State Board of Equalization, Supreme Court, and Courts of Appeal.(3) All statewide measures.(b) The Secretary of State shall prepare, certify, and file a statement of the vote from the compiled results no later than the 38th day after the election. two days after receiving election results from all county elections officials pursuant to Section 15375. The Secretary of State shall post the certified statement of the vote on his or her Internet Web site internet website in a downloadable spreadsheet format that may include, but is not limited to, a comma-separated values file or a tab-separated values file and that is compatible with a spreadsheet software application that is widely used at the time of the posting. The certified statement of the vote shall be posted and maintained on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site internet website for a period of at least 10 years following the election.(c) The Secretary of State may gather returns for local elections, including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Candidates for county office.(2) Candidates for city office.(3) Candidates for school and district office.(4) County ballot measures.(5) City ballot measures.(6) School and district ballot measures.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.